South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - State Board of Cosmetology, relating to Licensure for Out-of-State Applicants, designated as Regulation Document Number 5307, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Cosmetology proposes revising its regulations regarding licensure for out-of-state applicants. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----